Washington statutes.
RCW 39.33.050

Public mass transportation systems—Contracts for services or use.

The legislative body of any municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington authorized to develop and operate a public mass transportation system shall have power to contract with the legislative body of any other municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington, or with any person, firm or corporation for public transportation services or for the use of all or any part of any publicly owned transportation facilities for such period and under such terms and conditions and upon such rentals, fees and charges as the legislative body operating such public transportation system may determine, and may pledge all or any portion of such rentals, fees and charges and all other revenue derived from the ownership or operation of publicly owned transportation facilities to pay and to secure the payment of general obligation bonds and/or revenue bonds of such municipality issued for the purpose of acquiring or constructing a public mass transportation system.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 16.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 255: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.

Public transportation systems: RCW 35.58.272 and 35.58.2721.